Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-695
Peace officers; investigation of traffic accident; duty to report; Department of Transportation; powers; duties.

Any peace officer who investigates any traffic accident in the performance of his or her official duties shall, in all instances of an accident resulting in injury or death to any person or in which estimated damage equals or exceeds two thousand dollars to the property of any one person, submit an original report of such investigation to the Department of Transportation within ten days after each such accident. The department shall have authority to collect accident information it deems necessary and shall prescribe and furnish appropriate forms for reporting.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 104;

Laws 1985, LB 94, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 41;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,104;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 191;

Laws 2003, LB 185, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 185;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 29;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 82.
July 18, 2026